Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Examinations

§ 631.
Requirements; rules.

The Commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 governing the examination of new applicants for operator’s licenses and may prescribe requirements to obtain or hold a license or learner’s permit, by either a new or renewal applicant, as to driving experience, mental and physical qualifications, and any other matter or thing that, in his or her judgment, will contribute to the selection of safe and efficient operators.

Any written forms, applications, or tests used by the Department of Motor Vehicles for operator licensing shall be translated into primary languages of nations from which individuals assisted by the U.S. Committee for Refugees and Immigrants Vermont in the prior 10 years hail, as determined on an annual basis by the Department in consultation with the U.S. Committee for Refugees and Immigrants Vermont, and available at all Department locations and on the Department’s website if the English version is available. Nothing in this subsection is intended to require the Department to translate any educational manuals.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2019, No. 60

, § 23, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 632.
Examination required; waiver.

Before an operator’s or a junior operator’s license is issued to an applicant for the first time in this State, or before a renewal license is issued to an applicant whose previous Vermont license had expired more than three years prior to the application for renewal, the applicant shall pass a satisfactory examination, except that the Commissioner may, in his or her discretion, waive the examination when the applicant holds a chauffeur’s or operator’s license in force at the time of application or within three years prior to the application in some other jurisdiction where an examination is required similar to the examination required in this State.

The examination shall consist of:

an oral or written examination;

a thorough road test; and

at the discretion of the Commissioner, such other examination or demonstration as he or she may prescribe, including an oral eye examination.

An applicant may have an individual of his or her choosing at the oral examination or road test to serve as an interpreter, including to translate any oral commands given as part of the road test.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 47

, § 16;

2019, No. 60

, § 9;

2019, No. 60

, § 24, eff. Oct. 1, 2020;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 633.
Examiners.

Inspectors appointed under the provisions of section 103 of this title shall also be examiners of new applicants for operators’ licenses.

§ 634.
Fee for examination.

The fee for an examination for a learner’s permit shall be $32.00. The fee for an examination to obtain an operator’s license when the applicant is required to pass an examination pursuant to section 632 of this title shall be $19.00. The fee for a motorcycle skill test to obtain a motorcycle endorsement shall be $19.00.

A scheduling fee of $24.00 shall be paid by the applicant before he or she may schedule the road test required under section 632 of this title. Unless an applicant gives the Department at least 48 hours’ notice of cancellation, if the applicant does not appear as scheduled, the $24.00 scheduling fee is forfeited. If the applicant appears for the scheduled road test, the fee shall be applied toward the license examination fee. The Commissioner may waive the scheduling fee until the Department is capable of administering the fee electronically.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall not implement any procedures or processes for identifying applicants for licenses, learner permits, or nondriver identification cards that involve the use of biometric identifiers. Pursuant to the provisions of 49 U.S.C. § 31308, this subsection shall not apply to applicants for commercial driver licenses or endorsements on these licenses.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 51

, § 39;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 36;

2009, No. 50

, § 48;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 37.

§ 635.
Place of examinations.

The Commissioner shall cause examinations of operators to be held at such convenient times and places throughout the State as he or she may determine.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 74

, § 2.

§ 636.
Special examinations.

Whenever the Commissioner has good cause to believe that any holder of an operator’s license, or any applicant for renewal of an operator’s license, is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, he or she may require such person to submit to a special examination to determine his or her capabilities or mental or physical fitness. A person shall not be required to pay to the State a fee for such special examination, except for a component of an examination conducted by an authorized medical professional.
(a) (1) Whenever the Commissioner has good cause to believe that any holder of an operator’s license, or any applicant for renewal of an operator’s license, is incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed, he or she may require such person to submit to a special examination to determine his or her capabilities or mental or physical fitness. A person shall not be required to pay to the State a fee for such special examination, except for a component of an examination conducted by an authorized medical professional.

If the Commissioner determines that a special examination is warranted, then a driving examination shall be administered. If, under the Commissioner’s discretion, extenuating circumstances exist, the Commissioner may also administer a written or oral examination or require an examination by a medical professional under section 637 of this title. A driving, written, or oral examination shall be given at a time and place as the Commissioner may determine.

Upon the conclusion of such examination, the Commissioner shall take action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke the license or right of such person to operate a motor vehicle or may issue a license subject to restrictions as permitted under section 612 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 50

, § 101;

2015, No. 47

, § 17.

§ 637.
Examiners of physical and mental conditions.

The Commissioner may designate physicians, licensed physician assistants, licensed advanced practice registered nurses, ophthalmologists, oculists, and optometrists properly registered and authorized to practice in this State or in an adjoining state as examiners of operators. The Commissioner may refer any matter relative to the issuing, suspending, or reinstating of licenses that concerns the physical or mental condition or eyesight of any applicant for or holder of a license or any petitioner for reinstatement to, and require the applicant or other person to be examined by, such examiner in the vicinity of the person’s residence as he or she determines to be qualified to examine and report. Such examiner shall report to the Commissioner the true and actual result of examinations made by him or her together with his or her decision as to whether the person examined should be granted or allowed to retain an operator’s license or permitted to operate a motor vehicle.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 65.

§ 638.
Repealed. 2015, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 66.

§ 639.
Fees for physical and mental examinations.

The compensation of the examiners provided in section 637 of this title shall be paid by the person examined.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 67.